Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,143
Local housing agency representative; liability.

No representative of a local housing agency shall personally be civilly or criminally liable with respect to any matter or act not directly committed or authorized by such person.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 72.